Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2252.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3131(a), (b), (c) and (g) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended or added October 29, 2024 (P.L.1095, No.125), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3131. Unlawful dissemination of intimate image.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided in sections 5903 (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances), 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children) and 6321 (relating to transmission of sexually explicit images by minor), a person commits the offense of unlawful dissemination <--1234567891011121314151617 of intimate image if[, with intent to harass, annoy or alarm another,] the person NEGLIGENTLY disseminates:(1) [A visual depiction of the current or former sexual or intimate partner in a state of nudity or engaged in sexual conduct.] An intimate image of an individual.(2) An artificially generated [sexual depiction] intimate image of an individual.(a.1) Multiple images.--Dissemination of multiple intimate images of the same individual as part of a common act shall constitute a single offense under this section.(b) Defense.--It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the actor disseminated the [visual depiction] intimate image with the consent of the person depicted.(c) Grading.--(1) An offense under subsection (a)(1) shall be:(i) A misdemeanor of the first degree, when the person depicted is a minor.(ii) A misdemeanor of the [second] THIRD degree, when the person depicted is not a minor.(iii) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the dissemination is done with any of the following:(A) The intent to harass or alarm.(B) The intent to cause physical, mental, economic or reputational harm to the person depicted.(C) The intent to obtain profit or pecuniary gain.(D) The purpose of sexual arousal, sexual gratification, humiliation or degradation.(2) An offense under subsection (a)(2) shall be:(i) A misdemeanor of the first degree, when the 20260HB2252PN3573 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person depicted is a minor.(ii) A misdemeanor of the [second] THIRD degree, when the person depicted is not a minor.(iii) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the dissemination is done with any of the following:(A) The intent to harass or alarm.(B) The intent to cause physical, mental, economic or reputational harm to the person depicted.(C) The intent to obtain profit or pecuniary gain.(D) The purpose of sexual arousal, sexual gratification, humiliation or degradation.(c.1) Statute of limitations.--A prosecution under this section must be commenced within five years after the commission of the offense or within three years after the date the victim discovers the offense or reasonably should have discovered the offense through the exercise of due diligence, whichever is later.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and20260HB2252PN3573 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence.["Artificially generated sexual depiction." A visual depiction:(1) that appears to authentically depict an individual in a state of nudity or engaged in sexual conduct that did not occur in reality; and(2) the production of which was substantially dependent upon technical means, including artificial intelligence or photo editing software, rather than the ability of another person to physically impersonate the other person.]"Artificially generated intimate image." An image that:(1) appears to authentically depict an intimate image of an individual that did not occur in reality; or(2) was produced substantially by technical means, including artificial intelligence or photo editing software, rather than by the ability of another person to physically impersonate the individual."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence." Intimate image. " A still or video image OF AN IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL that depicts: (1) the wholly or partially uncovered genitals, pubic 20260HB2252PN3573 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area, anus or postpubescent female nipple or areola of an individual;(2) the display or transfer of semen or vaginal secretion; or(3) sexually explicit SEXUAL conduct. "Law enforcement officer." Any officer of the United States, of the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof, or of another state or subdivision thereof, who is empowered to conduct investigations of or to make arrests for offenses enumerated in this title or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, and any attorney authorized by law to prosecute or participate in the prosecution of such offense."Minor." An individual under 18 years of age.["Nudity." As defined in section 5903(e).]"Photo editing software." A software used primarily for editing photographs, videos or computer depictions that contains a variety of filters, effects or tools that can be used to manipulate photographs, videos or computer depictions.["Sexual conduct." As defined in section 5903(e).["Visual depiction." As defined in section 6321.]SECTION 2. SECTION 6312 OF TITLE 18 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 6312. SEXUAL ABUSE OF CHILDREN.* * *(D.2) SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT.--THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 PA.C.S. § 2154 (RELATING TO ADOPTION OF GUIDELINES FOR SENTENCING), SHALL PROVIDE FOR A SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT FOR THE COURTS TO CONSIDER IN CASES INVOLVING A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B), (C) OR (D) IF THE CHILD DEPICTED WAS A DESCENDANT, INCLUDING A STEPCHILD, 20260HB2252PN3573 - 5 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STEPGRANDCHILD, BROTHER, SISTER, NEPHEW, NIECE, COUSIN OR OTHER RELATIVE OF THE DEFENDANT.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2252PN3573 - 6 - <--1234